Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-9102
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature
finds that concussions are one of the most commonly reported injuries in children
and adolescents who participate in sports and recreational activities and
that the risk of catastrophic injury or death is significant when a concussion
or brain injury is not properly evaluated and managed.

(2) The Legislature
further finds that concussions are a type of brain injury that can range from
mild to severe and can disrupt the way the brain normally works. Concussions
can occur in any organized or unorganized sport or recreational activity and
can result from a fall or from players colliding with each other, the ground,
or with obstacles. Concussions occur with or without loss of consciousness,
but the vast majority occur without loss of consciousness.

(3) The Legislature
further finds that continuing to play with a concussion or symptoms of brain
injury leaves a young athlete especially vulnerable to greater injury and
even death. The Legislature recognizes that, despite having generally recognized
return-to-play standards for concussion and brain injury, some young athletes
are prematurely returned to play, resulting in actual or potential physical
injury or death.

Laws 2011, LB260, § 2.